Utah statutes.
58-72-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

Notwithstanding Section 58-1-302, an applicant for licensure as a licensed acupuncturist shall:

(1)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;

(2)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(3)  be of good moral character;

(4)  meet the requirements for current active certification in acupuncture under guidelines established by the National Commission for the Certification of Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine (NCCAOM) as demonstrated through a current certificate or other appropriate documentation;

(5)  pass the examination required by the division by rule;

(6)  establish procedures, as defined by rule, which shall enable patients to give informed consent to treatment; and

(7)  meet with the board, if requested, for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

